District of Columbia statutes.
42-3404.35

Rights of tenants not abrogated.

No provision of this subchapter shall abrogate the rights of tenants or tenant organizations under this chapter.

History

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 435
as added Dec. 24, 2008, D.C. Law 17-286, § 2, 55 DCR 11989